Arkansas, session 2025, SB225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Medicaid category for sickle cell disease.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall create a new category of
coverage solely for providing treatment to beneficiaries who have a diagnosis
of sickle cell disease.
(b) The Department of Human Services shall apply for any federal
waiver, Medicaid state plan amendment, or other authorization necessary to
implement this section.







*JMB363*
02/13/2025 8:42:32 AM JMB363